Massachusetts, session 194th, H5556.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding Section 24 of Chapter 54 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the City Council in the City of Fall River may, by recorded
and public vote, change any polling place previously designated under said Section 24 to be used
at the election not less than 20 days prior to the date of the election if it is determined that the
public convenience or public health would be better served; provided, however, that alcoholic
beverages shall not be served or consumed in that portion of a building used as a polling place
during voting hours or while ballots are being counted therein. The City Council may designate
polling places in non-adjacent precincts if they determine the public convenience or public health
would be better served. In making a decision to change a polling place, the City Council shall
evaluate and report on whether such change would have a disparate, adverse impact on access to
the polls on the basis of race, national origin, disability, income or age and, not later than 3 days
prior to changing a polling place, the City Council shall make publicly available on its website
of 2

and at the office of the City Clerk a report on its evaluation. When the polling places have been
designated pursuant to this act, the Board of Registrars shall post on the municipal website and at
other such places as it may determine a description of the polling places and shall notify voters
by using an electronic means, to the extent available, such as via email or reverse 911 call.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2